Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 15

Office and Agent

48-15-101. Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation must continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who may be:

An individual who resides in this state and whose business office is identical with the registered office;

A domestic corporation or not for profit domestic corporation whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A foreign corporation or not for profit foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose business office is identical with the registered office.

If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform the registered agent's duties, the designating corporation shall promptly designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 5.01.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, office and agent, title 48, ch. 55.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-604.

Law Reviews.

The Future of General Jurisdiction in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 559 (1997).

48-15-102. Change of registered office or registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

The name of the corporation;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office and the zip code for such office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered agent’s registered office), and the county in which the office is located;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of such registered agent's business office, such registered agent may change the street address of the registered office of any corporation for which such registered agent is the registered agent by notifying the corporation in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) and recites that the corporation has been notified of the change.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 5.02; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 29, 48; 1991, ch. 188, § 11; 2012, ch. 1051, § 20; 2014, ch. 783, § 3.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, inserted “(or a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered agent’s registered office)” in (a)(2).

The 2014 amendment substituted “and a mailing address” for “or a mailing address” in (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 62. January 1, 2013; provided, that, for the purpose of the secretary of state taking necessary actions for the implementation of the act, the act shall take effect May 21, 2012.

Acts 2014, ch. 783, § 24. July 1, 2014.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-601, 5-602.

48-15-103. Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign the registered agent's agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by the registered agent's certification that the registered agent has mailed a copy thereof to the principal office of the corporation by certified mail. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 5.03.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-603.

48-15-104. Service on corporation.

A corporation's registered agent is the corporation's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation.

Whenever a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, whenever its registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence, whenever a foreign corporation shall transact business or conduct affairs in this state without first procuring a certificate of authority to do so from the secretary of state, or whenever the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation shall have been withdrawn or revoked, then the secretary of state shall be an agent of such corporation upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served.

Whenever a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state is an employer within the meaning of the Workers' Compensation Law and such corporation is, for the purpose of such Workers' Compensation Law, self insured or a part of a self-insurance pool as provided in title 50, chapter 6, part 4, such corporation shall, for workers' compensation actions only, be required to appoint the commissioner of commerce and insurance and the commissioner's chief deputy, or their successors, as its true and lawful attorneys upon either of whom all lawful process in any such action or legal proceeding against it may be served as is required of insurance companies by § 56-2-103.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 5.04; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 30, 47.

Cross-References. Foreign corporations subject to actions, § 20-2-201.

Workers' compensation insurance, title 50, ch. 6, part 4.

48-15-105. Procedure for service on domestic or foreign corporation by service on secretary of state.

Service on the secretary of state, when the secretary of state is an agent for a domestic or foreign corporation as provided in § 48-15-104(b), of any process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to the secretary of state the original and one (1) copy of such process, notice, or demand, duly certified by the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending or brought, together with the proper fee. A statement which identifies which of the grounds, as listed in § 48-15-104(b), for service on the secretary of state is applicable, must be included. The secretary of state shall endorse the time of receipt upon the original and copy and immediately shall send the copy, along with a written notice that service of the original was also made, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to such corporation at its registered office (or designated alternative mailing address) or principal office (or designated alternative mailing address) as shown in the records on file in the secretary of state's office or as shown in the official registry of the state or country in which such corporation is incorporated. If none of the previously mentioned addresses are available to the secretary of state, service may be made on any one (1) of the incorporators at the address set forth in the charter. The secretary of state may require the plaintiff (or complainant as the case may be) or the plaintiff's (or complainant's) attorney to furnish the latter address.

The refusal or failure of such corporation to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail provided for in subsection (a), or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, shall not affect the validity of such service; and any such corporation refusing or failing to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be charged with knowledge of the contents of any process, notice, or demand contained therein.

When the registered or certified mail return receipt is received by the secretary of state or when a corporation refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail and it is returned to the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall forward the receipt or such refused or undelivered mail to the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending, together with the original process, notice, or demand, a copy of the notice the secretary of state sent to the defendant corporation and the secretary of state's affidavit setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with this section. Upon receipt thereof, the clerk shall copy the affidavit on the rule docket of the court and shall mark it, the receipt or refused or undelivered mail, and the copy of notice as of the day received and place them in the file of the suit or action where the process and pleadings are kept, and such receipt or refused or undelivered mail, affidavit, and copy of notice shall be and become a part of the technical record in the suit or action and thereupon service on the defendant shall be complete. Service made under this section shall have the same legal force and validity as if the service had been made personally in this state.

Subsequent pleadings or papers permitted or required to be served on such defendant domestic or foreign corporation may be served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant corporation in the same manner, at the same cost and with the same effect as process, notice, or demand are served on the secretary of state as agent for such defendant corporation under this section.

No appearance shall be required in the suit or action by the defendant domestic or foreign corporation nor shall any judgment be taken against the defendant domestic or foreign corporation in less than one (1) month after the date service is completed under this section.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon the secretary of state under this section, which record shall include the time of such service and the secretary of state's action with reference thereto.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 5.05; 1989, ch. 451, § 6; 2012, ch. 1051, § 21.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.